Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1751.
Contract.

A contract between a board of school directors and a teacher shall not be valid unless the same is in writing, or partly written and partly printed, in triplicate, and signed by the teacher and by a majority of the board or by a member of the board or other person who has been duly authorized by a majority vote of the board at a regular meeting to sign the contract in question on behalf of the board.
One copy thereof shall be filed with the board, one copy delivered to the teacher, and one copy delivered to the superintendent.
Such contract shall specify the date when the teacher shall begin service, the time, grade, and date of expiration of the license held by the teacher, the salary of the teacher and such other matters as may be necessary for a complete understanding between the parties.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 118

, § 3.

§ 1752.
GROUNDS AND PROCEDURES FOR SUSPENSION AND DISMISSAL

A teacher under contract to teach in a public school who fails, without just cause, to complete the term for which the teacher contracted to teach shall be disqualified to teach in any public school for the remainder of the school year.

The provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section regarding the nonrenwal, suspension, and dismissal of teachers shall not apply to a teacher employed under the terms of a collective bargaining agreement under chapter 57 of this title that provides the teacher just cause rights. The decision to nonrenew, suspend without pay, or dismiss a teacher shall be made by the school board.

A teacher under contract to teach in a public school whose contract is not to be renewed for the ensuing year shall be notified in writing, setting forth the grounds therefor, not later than April 15. If the teacher so notified desires a hearing, the teacher shall so request in writing to the clerk of the school board. The teacher shall have the right to a hearing before the school directors within 15 days, may present witnesses and written evidence, and may be represented by counsel. A hearing shall be in executive session unless the teacher making the appeal requests or agrees in writing that it be open to the public. The school board shall affirm, modify, or reverse the nonrenewal and shall issue its decision in writing within five days. In the case of a probationary teacher who has received two written performance evaluations per year of probationary service, a decision of the board shall be final. The standard for nonrenewal of a contract shall be:

In the case of a nonprobationary teacher, just and sufficient cause.

In the case of a probationary teacher, any reason other than those prohibited by law. However, the standard for nonrenewal for a probationary teacher’s contract shall be just and sufficient cause if the teacher has not received at least two written performance evaluations per year of probationary service. A probationary teacher is a person who has been employed as a teacher in Vermont public schools for less than two school years.

The following provisions shall apply to the suspension or dismissal of a teacher:

A superintendent may suspend a teacher under contract on the grounds of incompetence, conduct unbecoming a teacher, failure to attend to duties, or failure to carry out reasonable orders and directions of the superintendent and school board.

The suspension shall be in writing and shall set forth the grounds therefor. Copies shall be delivered to the teacher, to the chair, and to the clerk of the board of school directors. Thereafter, performance under the teacher’s contract shall be suspended, but the teacher shall be paid pro rata to the time of dismissal by the board.

The teacher so suspended shall have the right to appeal to the board of school directors of the district for review of the decision. Filing a written notice of appeal with the clerk of the school board within seven days after the effective date of the suspension shall initiate the appeal. The clerk of the board shall forthwith forward a copy of the notice of appeal to the superintendent and send to the teacher an acknowledgment of receipt of the appeal.

The school board to which the appeal is directed shall hear the appeal within 10 days after receipt of notification. The teacher and the superintendent shall be advised by the clerk of the board of the time and place of hearing by written notice at least three days before the date of hearing.

All parties shall be entitled to counsel at every stage of the proceedings established by this section. Hearings shall be in executive session, unless the teacher making an appeal requests or agrees in writing that they be open to the public. A teacher making an appeal may waive in writing the right to a hearing.

Upon hearing, or if no appeal is taken, the school board shall affirm or reverse the suspension or take such other action, including dismissal, as may appear just. If the suspension or the dismissal is reversed, the teacher shall not suffer any loss of pay, retirement benefits, or any other benefits to which the teacher would otherwise have been entitled.

The decision of the school board shall be in writing and filed with the clerk of the school board not later than five days after the hearing or after the time for taking an appeal has expired. The clerk shall within three days notify the superintendent and the teacher in writing of the decision.

No court action shall lie on the part of a teacher against any school district for breach of contract by reason of suspension or dismissal unless the procedures described in this section have been followed by the teacher.

Every teacher’s contract shall be deemed to contain the provisions of this section, and any provision in the contract inconsistent with this section shall be considered of no force or effect.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 132

;

1975, No. 79

;

1997, No. 127

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 72;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 80;

2021, No. 111

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, effective May 11, 2022.

§ 1753.
Time not spent in teaching counted in determining compensation.

The time not exceeding five days during any one year, actually spent by a teacher in attendance upon a meeting of the State education associations, or upon educational meetings held under the authority of the Board of Education, and the time actually spent by a teacher in visiting schools when so directed by the superintendent, shall, in determining the compensation of the teacher, be counted the same as if spent in teaching.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 33

, § 5.

§ 1754.
Repealed.
1975, No. 48, § 14, eff. April 15, 1975.

§ 1755.
Sick leave.

A full time teacher under contract to teach the regular school year in a public school shall be allowed a minimum of 10 days’ sick leave with full pay during each school year. Sick leave not used shall be cumulative at least to 20 days, so long as the teacher is employed in the same school district.

The word “days” shall mean school days.

The use of sick leave as provided in this section shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the directors of each school district.

HISTORY:

Added

1957, No. 173

, §§ 1-3; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 81.

§ 1756.
Protection of teachers, employees, and board members in damage suits.

A town, city, incorporated, or union school district and a supervisory union shall indemnify and save harmless to the extent of the policy limits provided in subsection (b) of this section any person employed by the school district or supervisory union and any member of its executive, supervisory, or administrative staff, including members of the school board, from financial loss and expense, including reasonable legal fees and costs, if any, arising out of any claim, demand, suit, or judgment by reason of alleged negligence or other act resulting in accidental injury to a person or accidental damage to or destruction of property, within or outside the school building, provided that the indemnified person at the time of the accident resulting in such injury, damage, or destruction was acting in the discharge of his or her duties within the scope of his or her employment or under the direction of the board of the school district or of the supervisory union.

Each board of a school district or a supervisory union shall insure against the liability imposed upon it by this section in any insurance company organized in this State or in any insurance company of another state authorized by law to write insurance in this State, or through participation in an intermunicipal insurance agreement established under 24 V.S.A. chapter 121, subchapter 6, with minimum coverage in the form of a comprehensive general liability policy including liability for the operation of owned and nonowned motor vehicles and including the employees as additional insureds and with minimum limits of not less than $500,000.00 per person and $2 million per occurrence for bodily injury and for property damage.

Each board of a school district or a supervisory union required to insure against the liability imposed upon it by this section shall furnish proof of insurance with the minimum limits prescribed by this section to the Secretary of Education, which shall be evidence of the insuring against the liability and property damage required by this section. In the event of cancellation, the board shall provide at least 30 days’ prior notice of cancellation to the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 123

; amended

1975, No. 48

, § 13, eff. April 15, 1975;

1975, No. 100

, § 1;

2003, No. 36

, § 12;

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2005;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 171, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.